New Jersey, session 221, A573.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the Loan Redemption Program for Teachers of Agriculture Act." 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  There are 45 approved agricultural education programs in 33 New Jersey school districts; b.  Since 2009, 39 teachers from 22 New Jersey Agricultural Science Education programs have transformed their agriculture programs from traditional horticulture or agriculture programs to academically/STEM-infused agricultural science programs using the national Curriculum for Agricultural Science Education (CASE) Program; c.  Agriculture classrooms are being transformed into agricultural science laboratories with lab tables, hand held computers, test tubes, microscopes, and other equipment; d.  The United States Department of Agriculture projects that there will be nearly 58,000 average annual openings for graduates with a bachelors degree or higher in the field of food, agriculture, renewable natural resources, and the environment, but less than 36,000 qualified graduates to fill those openings; e.  College graduates with expertise in food, agriculture, renewable natural resources, and the environment are essential to our ability to address the national priorities of food security, sustainable energy, and environmental quality; f.  Food and agriculture are New Jerseys third largest industry.  In 2015, the States 9,071 farms generated cash receipts of about $1 billion; and g.  In order to meet future labor demand in this vital industry, it is imperative that high schools are able to offer and staff high-quality academic programs that ignite students interest in agricultural science careers. 3.    As used in this act: "Approved course of study" means an undergraduate program leading to a bachelor's degree offered by a four-year public or independent institution of higher education. "Authority" means the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority established pursuant to N.J.S.18A:71A-3. "Eligible student loan expenses" mean the cumulative outstanding balance of student loans, covering the cost of attendance while enrolled in an approved course of study. Interest paid or due on student loans that a program participant has taken out for use in paying the costs of attendance at an institution of higher education shall be considered eligible for reimbursement under the program. "Program" means the Loan Redemption Program for Teachers of Agriculture established pursuant to this act. "Program participant" means a person who has executed a contract with the authority for participation in the program. 4.    a.  There is established the Loan Redemption Program for Teachers of Agriculture within the Higher Education Student Assistance Authority.  The purpose of the program is to provide an incentive for individuals to begin a career in agricultural education.  The program shall provide for the redemption of a portion of the eligible student loan expenses of a program participant for each year of full-time employment in a school district as a certified teacher in a career and technical education program in agriculture approved by the Department of Education. b.    The authority shall limit the number of participants to a total of ten participants in each program year. 5.    To be eligible to participate in the program, an applicant shall: a.     be a resident of the State and maintain domicile in the State during participation in the program; b.    have successfully completed an approved course of study within a five-year period prior to applying for the program; c.     have an outstanding balance with a State or federal student loan program and not be in default on any student loan; and d.    be a certified teacher who holds an endorsement issued by the State Board of Examiners that authorizes the holder to teach agriculture. 6.    a.  An individual may apply to the authority to participate in the program in such a manner as the authority prescribes and shall include all information and documentation required by the authority. b.    A program participant shall enter into a written contract with the authority to participate in the program.  The contract shall specify the duration of the applicant's required employment as a teacher of agriculture, which shall be no less than five years, and the total amount of eligible student loan expenses to be redeemed by the State in return for employment as a teacher of agriculture. c.     The redemption of loans under the program shall not exceed $10,000 of principal and interest of eligible student loan expenses for each full year of employment by the program participant.  The total loan redemption amount for a program participant, for five years of employment, shall not exceed $50,000.  No amount of loan redemption shall be provided for employment performed for less than a full year. d.    The period of service shall commence on or after the date of enactment of this act. 7.    a.  A program participant who has entered into a redemption contract with the authority may nullify that contract by submitting written notification to the authority and assuming full responsibility for repayment of the full amount of the participant's loan or that portion of the loan that has not been redeemed by the State in return for partial fulfillment of the contract. b.    In the case of a program participant's death or total or permanent disability, the authority shall nullify the service obligation of the participant, thereby terminating the participant's service obligation; or where continued enforcement of the contract may result in extreme hardship, the authority may nullify or suspend the participant's service obligation. 8.    The authority shall annually submit a report on the program to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1).  The report shall be submitted no later than August 1 of each year and shall include, but not be limited to, the following information for the prior fiscal year: a.     the total number of participants receiving loan redemption under the program; b.    the impact of the program on attracting individuals to teach in the field of agriculture; and c.     the total number of participants who withdrew from the program and failed to complete the program's requirements. 9.    The Higher Education Student Assistance Authority, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 10. This act shall take effect on the 90th day after the date of enactment.